Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB693.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 96.150 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any city that owns or operates a water supply or sanitary sewer system may extend
the system into, and furnish and sell water and provide sanitary sewers to any
person within, any territory contiguous to the city, and may install within that
territory necessary apparatus; provided, however, that the extension of a water
supply or sanitary sewer system shall not enter into any territory served by an
existing water supply or sanitary sewer district unless such district requests the
extension of water or sewer services from a city. For these purposes the city or
sanitation authority established by an interlocal agreement may condemn or
otherwise acquire franchises, rights, and rights-of-way, as private corporations may
do.
(2) When extending the system to any person, water district, or water association, the
city may consider the installation of fire hydrants on the extended lines. The city
may extend water lines which are incapable of servicing fire hydrants only if the
city determines that servicing hydrants is not feasible. The determination shall
include consideration of the incremental costs of adequately sized pipe and
associated pumps and towers, and the benefits of real estate development, water
sales, the availability of fire protection insurance, and the reduction in fire insurance
premiums which may result from the installation of hydrants at specified intervals.
When extending lines to a water district or water association, the determination may
be made in consultation with the district or association, taking into consideration
their fiscal capacity.
(3) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, if a city that owns or
operates a water supply or sanitary sewer system extends its system into territory
that is served by an existing water supply or sanitary sewer system pursuant to
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/20/2026 12:58 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 278
subsection (1) of this section, and the city-owned or operated system fails to
provide water or sanitary sewer service to the newly extended service territory
within the time period specified by agreement with the previous service provider
or its customers, then any customer in that newly extended service territory may
elect to receive its water or sanitary sewer service from the previous provider in
the territory for as long as the service is available.
Section 2. Subsection (3) of Section 1 of this Act shall apply retroactively to all
customers whose properties have been included in the extension of a municipal water
supply or sanitary sewer system's territory but have not received service from the
municipal utility within the time period specified by agreement with the previous service
provider or its customers.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/20/2026 12:58 PM Jacketed